Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,183
Following fire apparatus in response to an alarm; prohibited.

The driver of any vehicle other than one on official business shall not follow any fire apparatus traveling in response to a fire alarm closer than five hundred feet or drive into or park such vehicle within the block where fire apparatus has stopped in answer to a fire alarm.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 81;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-681;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 279.